Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.195

Statewide sexual assault kit tracking system—Participation by local law enforcement agencies.

Local law enforcement agencies shall participate in the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system established in RCW 43.43.545 for the purpose of tracking the status of all sexual assault kits in the custody of local law enforcement agencies and other entities contracting with local law enforcement agencies. Local law enforcement agencies shall begin full participation in the system according to the implementation schedule established by the Washington state patrol.

[ 2016 c 173 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 173: See note following RCW 43.43.545.